Maine, session 132, LD1046.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4307, sub-§3, as repealed and replaced by PL 1987, c. 349, Pt.
H, §15, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4307, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Residency requirement. An applicant must prove to the municipality that the
applicant has been physically present for 180 days or longer in the State prior to applying
for general assistance. Acceptable forms of proof of residency must include the applicant's
name and the address of the applicant's residence or domicile. A post office box or mail
drop address is not sufficient. Acceptable proof of residency includes, but is not limited
to:
A. A tax return, W-2 form or paycheck stub;
B. A utility bill or a letter from a utility company showing application for service;
C. A contract to which the applicant is a party; or
D. A document issued by a governmental entity.